Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 14
STRATEGIES FOR WASTE TIRES

30-20-1401. Legislative declaration - rules - enforcement - recyclable material.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that, in order to protect the environment and the public health, there is a special need to address problems created by the disposal of waste tires and the lack of recycling and beneficial use of waste tires. It is the policy of this state to pursue proposals for recycling and other beneficial use of waste tires in lieu of storage or landfill disposal, and, in addition, it is the intent of the general assembly in adopting this part 14 to encourage the development of techniques for resource recovery, recycling, and reuse of waste tires and to provide for the management of waste tires.

By May 31, 2015, the commission shall promulgate rules for the implementation and enforcement of this part 14. Until the commission promulgates rules to implement and enforce this part 14, the commission's rules in effect on July 1, 2014, governing waste tires continue to apply to the extent that they do not conflict with this part 14.

The department shall enforce this part 14 through its enforcement authorities, including those specified in sections 30-20-113 and 30-20-114.

After tires are used for their original intended purpose, they must be used beneficially, recycled, or reused; except that, if authorized by section 30-20-1414 (1)(b), they may be disposed of at a permitted solid waste facility. Because they can be reused, remanufactured, reclaimed, or recycled, waste tires are a recyclable material as defined in section 30-20-101 (4). As recyclable materials, waste tires must be collected, managed, and transported in accordance with the manifest system required by section 30-20-1417 (2) and recycled into tire-derived product, thereby being transformed from a recyclable material into a new product. The department shall consider tires that have been collected under a tire collection program registered pursuant to section 30-20-1411 to have been managed under an approved established tire collection program for purposes of the federal commercial industrial solid waste incinerator rules, 40 CFR part 60 subparts CCCC and DDDD.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1576, § 1, effective July 1.

30-20-1402. Definitions.

As used in this part 14, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Alternative daily cover" means at least three inches of earthen material or other suitable material placed over the exposed solid waste at the end of each operating day, or at such frequencies as needed to prevent or minimize nuisance conditions.

(1.2) "ASTM standard D6270" means the American Society for Testing and Materials standard entitled "Standard Practice for Use of Scrap Tires in Civil Engineering Applications", effective on December 15, 2017.

(1.5) "Beneficial user" means a person who uses solid waste for energy recovery in a manufacturing process or as an effective substitute for natural or commercial products, in a manner that does not pose a threat to human health or the environment. Avoidance of processing or disposal cost alone does not constitute beneficial use.

"Commission" means the solid and hazardous waste commission created in section 25-15-302, C.R.S.

"Department" means the department of public health and environment.

"End user" means a person who:

Uses a tire-derived product for a commercial or industrial purpose;

Uses a whole waste tire to generate energy or fuel; or

Consumes tire-derived product or uses tire-derived product in its final application or in making new materials with a demonstrated sale to a third-party customer.

"Mobile processor" means a person who processes waste tires at a location other than the location of the person's certificate of registration.

"Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle that is designed for travel on the public highways and that is generally and commonly used to transport persons and property over the public highways or a low speed electric vehicle. "Motor vehicle" includes automobiles, minivans, all trucks, motor homes, and motorcycles.

"Public project" means:

A publicly funded contract entered into by a governmental body of the executive branch of this state that is subject to the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S.; and

A publicly funded contract entered into by a county, municipal government, or special district, including a school district or recreation district.

(7.5) "Rural county" means a county with a population of fewer than sixty thousand residents.

"Tire" means a rubber cushion that fits around a wheel.

"Tire-derived product" means matter that:

Is derived from a process that uses whole tires as a feedstock, including shredding, crumbing, and chipping;

Adheres to established engineering or other appropriate specifications or to established product end user specifications or customer conditions of acceptance;

Has a demonstrated benefit associated with the end use;

Can be used as a substitute for or in conjunction with a commercial product or raw material; and

Has either been sold and removed from the facility of a processor or has been used on site by the processor.

(9.5) "Ton" means a unit of weight equal to two thousand pounds.

"Trailer" means a wheeled vehicle, without motive power, that is designed to be drawn by a motor vehicle.

"Used tire" means a tire that was previously used as a tire and is graded and classified for reuse as a tire based on specifications and criteria maintained pursuant to section 30-20-1410 (1)(a).

"Waste tire" means a tire that is modified from its original specifications but not processed into a tire-derived product, is no longer being used for its initial intended purpose as a tire, and is not a used tire.

"Waste tire cleanup program" or "program" means the program created by this part 14.

"Waste tire collection facility" means a facility at which waste tires are stored awaiting pickup by a registered waste tire hauler for transportation to a registered waste tire processor or registered waste tire monofill.

"Waste tire generator" means a person who generates waste tires. The term includes new tire retailers, used tire retailers, automobile dealers, automobile dismantlers, public and private vehicle maintenance shops, garages, service stations, car care centers, automotive fleet centers, local government fleet operators, and rental fleet operators.

"Waste tire hauler" means a person who transports ten or more waste tires in any one load.

"Waste tire monofill" means part or all of a solid wastes disposal site and facility that has been issued a certificate of designation and at which only waste tires are accepted.

"Waste tire processor" means a person who processes a waste tire into a tire-derived product.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1577, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1) amended and (1.2), (1.5), (7.5), and (9.5) added, (SB 19-198), ch. 402, p. 3558, § 1, effective August 2.

30-20-1403. Waste tire fee - distribution - rules.

Repealed.
(1) (a) (I) Repealed.

Effective January 1, 2020, and continuing through December 31, 2025, retailers of new motor vehicle tires and new trailer tires shall collect a waste tire fee in an amount to be set by the commission, by rule, not to exceed two dollars on the sale of each new tire; except that, effective on and after January 1, 2024, the waste tire fee is fifty-five cents on the sale of each new tire.

Effective January 1, 2020, the commission may review the fee on an annual basis and, by rule, adjust the fee amount in a manner consistent with the obligations set forth in subsection (2) of this section. The commission shall set the fee in an amount that is sufficient to:

Offset the department's direct and indirect costs of implementing this part 14, which costs must not exceed the equivalent of fifty cents for each new tire sold; and

Cover the rebate program described in section 30-20-1405.

The receipt from the retailer to the customer for every new tire purchased must contain the following statement in the largest bold-faced type capable based on point-of-sale software and on existing invoice printers, not to exceed fifteen points: "Section 30-20-1403, Colorado Revised Statutes, requires retailers to collect a waste tire fee set by the solid and hazardous waste commission on the sale of each new motor vehicle tire and each new trailer tire."

The retailer shall submit to the department by the twentieth day of each month all fees collected pursuant to this section in the preceding month together with any report required by the department. The department shall transmit the fees to the state treasurer, who shall credit them in accordance with subsection (2) of this section or as specified in rules promulgated by the commission.

From January 1, 2020, through December 31, 2025, the state treasurer shall distribute the revenue from the fee assessed in subsection (1) of this section as follows:

The portion of the fee collected to offset the costs described in subsection (1)(a)(III)(A) of this section to the waste tire administration, enforcement, market development, and cleanup fund created in section 30-20-1404; and

The portion of the fee collected to cover the costs described in subsection (1)(a)(III)(B) of this section to the end users fund created in section 30-20-1405.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2019.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2019.)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1579, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, (SB 19-198), ch. 402, p. 3559, § 2, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(a)(I)(B) provided for the repeal of subsection (1)(a)(I), effective July 1, 2020. (See L. 2019, p. 3559.)

30-20-1404. Waste tire administration, enforcement, market development, and cleanup fund - creation - rules.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the waste tire administration, enforcement, market development, and cleanup fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", consisting of the fee revenue credited pursuant to section 30-20-1403 and any other money appropriated to it. The general assembly shall annually appropriate the money in the fund to the department for its direct and indirect administrative and enforcement costs in administering and enforcing this part 14. The state treasurer shall credit all interest earned on the investment of money in the fund to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund in excess of sixteen and one-half percent of the previous fiscal year's expenditures at the end of any fiscal year shall be credited:

Through December 31, 2025, to the end users fund created in section 30-20-1405; and

On and after January 1, 2026, to the general fund.

The department shall use the money in the fund for:

Collecting the fee assessed in section 30-20-1403 (1);

Inspecting retailers to determine whether all fees are being collected;

Enforcing the requirements of this part 14 pursuant to existing authority, including sections 30-20-113 and 30-20-114;

Developing a system to address the receipt by registered persons of unmanifested waste tires from unregistered haulers;

Repealed.

Hiring a contractor to clean up waste tires and tire-derived product that have been illegally disposed of or have been disposed of at a landfill pursuant to section 30-20-1009 (2) and funding a grant program to reimburse local governing authorities for cleaning up waste tires and tire-derived products that have been illegally disposed of or have been disposed of at a landfill pursuant to section 30-20-1009 (2);

Financing one-time or occasional community cleanup events where waste tires are accepted for drop-off by persons not engaged in commercial or industrial activity and where, at the conclusion of the event, the waste tires are either picked up by a registered waste tire hauler or transported to a registered waste tire hauler or to any registered facility;

Training and hiring contractors to provide training in the implementation of this part 14;

Providing grants to law enforcement, fire departments, local health departments, state agencies, and any other applicable entities for purchasing equipment and supplies to implement this part 14;

Training of and enforcement by entities that enforce this part 14;

Awarding grants and developing educational programs for enforcement, fire prevention and suppression, proper waste tire management and disposal, training, and customer technical assistance;

Maintaining an online complaint form and processes for law enforcement, fire departments, and citizens to report potential waste tire violations;

Repealed.

Encouraging waste tire market development; and

Reimbursing the division of fire prevention and control in the department of public safety for:

Inspections of facilities where waste tires are present conducted by the division to determine whether the waste tire collection facilities, waste tire processors, and waste tire monofills are in compliance with the rules promulgated by the director of the division pursuant to section 24-33.5-1203.5 (2); and

Technical and other assistance the division provides to the department or the public related to waste tires, including assistance related to:

The development of fire prevention education materials; and

Review of fire prevention plans.

If the department is denied access or if consent to access has not been given to clean up a site where the department reasonably believes waste tires exist illegally, the department may obtain from the district court for the judicial district in which the property is located a warrant to enter the property and remove the waste tires.

In addition to any penalties assessed, the department may issue an order requiring the owner or operator to compensate the department for the cost of remediation of the site, and the department may request the attorney general to bring suit for compensation from the owner or operator for money expended remediating the site. The department shall use the recovered moneys to reimburse the fund for actual costs of remediating the site and of seeking compensation pursuant to this section. The state treasurer shall credit all additional moneys to the general fund.

The department may place a lien on a property on which the department funds the remediation of waste tires pursuant to this section until the costs of remediation have been repaid to the department. If complete repayment has not been made before a sale of the property, the department shall be repaid in full, to the extent possible, from proceeds of the sale.

In providing assistance pursuant to this section, the department shall give primary consideration to protection of public health and the environment.

In awarding contracts for services pursuant to this section, the department may give preferential bidding treatment to individuals or entities that will recycle, pursuant to rules of the department concerning recycling, and reuse, rather than dispose of, the waste tires.

The department shall, either itself or through a contractor, create a priority abatement list of illegal waste tire disposal sites.

The department and the department of transportation shall coordinate with one another to systematically investigate and research the use of tire-derived aggregates in technically feasible and economically viable civil applications associated with the department of transportation's roadway mission. The department shall include any findings regarding tire-derived aggregates, as appropriate, in the department's annual report to the general assembly.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, on June 30, 2020, the state treasurer shall transfer five million three hundred seventy-two thousand four hundred fifteen dollars from the fund to the general fund.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1580, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1), IP(2), (2)(l), and (2)(m) amended and (2)(o) added, (SB 19-198), ch. 402, p. 3560, § 3, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(8) added, (HB 20-1406), ch. 178, p. 814, § 18, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

(2)(m) repealed, (2)(o) amended, and (2)(p) added, (SB 22-170), ch. 470, p. 3435, § 1, effective June 8.

30-20-1405. End users fund - creation - quarterly rebates - rules - repeal.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the end users fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", consisting of the fee revenue credited pursuant to section 30-20-1403 (2)(a)(II). The state treasurer shall credit all interest and any other return on the investment of money in the fund to the fund. The fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the department for the purposes specified in this section.

(1.5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, on June 30, 2020, the state treasurer shall transfer one million four hundred thousand dollars from the fund to the general fund.

The department shall use the money in the fund to provide quarterly rebates to in-state:

End users; and

Retailers that sell tire-derived products.

A waste tire hauler of tires in a rural county is only eligible for rebates pursuant to this subsection (2) if the waste tire hauler is also an end user or has contracted with an end user that is also a waste tire hauler.

The rebate is subject to the following conditions:

The department shall pay the rebate amount quarterly, on a per-ton basis; and

Once the department has paid a rebate on a particular quantity of tire-derived product, every part of that particular quantity of tire-derived product is no longer eligible for payment of the rebate.

The commission shall annually set the amount of the rebate, by rule, on a per-ton basis, and the department shall pay the set rebate amount for each ton of qualified tire-derived product. The commission shall calculate the rebate to equal, but not exceed, the amount of the anticipated income transferred into the fund during each succeeding twelve-month period.

Each year, the department shall continue to provide the rebate in accordance with the tiered structure set forth in subsection (5)(e) of this section until:

All qualified rebate requests submitted in that year are satisfied; or

There is insufficient money in the fund to support additional rebate payments.

The commission shall promulgate rules governing administration of the rebate, which rules must include the following:

A quarterly rebate schedule for qualified recipients, with the first end user payout in July 2020, to be issued for end uses that occur between April 1, 2020, and June 30, 2020;

A requirement that twenty-five percent of the expected annual rebate amount be held in reserve before paying the first quarterly rebate;

If the balance of the fund is anticipated to be insufficient to pay out all of the rebates applied for, a requirement that the department:

Give notice of the anticipated insufficiency to all end users that during the preceding twelve months have submitted an application for a rebate; and

Pay a proportionally reduced rebate beginning with tier 1 and rural waste tire hauler rebate recipients, continuing to tier 2 rebate recipients, and ending with tier 3 rebate recipients;

A requirement that an end user that qualifies for a rebate by utilizing waste tires for:

Alternative daily cover must verify with the department that the alternative daily cover meets all specification standards for all type-B tire-derived aggregate, as established by the ASTM standard D6270; and

Tire-derived aggregate must verify with the department that the tire-derived aggregate meets all specification standards for all type-A tire-derived aggregate, as established by the ASTM standard D6270; and

Three tiers of rebate amounts that the department may pay out based on the amount of the waste tire that was used and destroyed as follows:

Tier 1: Full rebates going to crumbed rubber end uses and end uses that completely destroy the waste tire for the purpose of energy recovery or other clean technologies as defined and approved by the commission by rule;

Tier 2: Fifty percent of the full rebate going to end uses such as molded products and rubber mulch; and

Tier 3: Twenty-five percent of the full rebate going to tire bale end uses and end uses for alternative daily cover and tire-derived aggregate that meet the ASTM standard D6270.

The department:

Shall pay:

The rebate only for waste tires that are generated and processed in Colorado; and

An end user only if the end use involves tire-derived products in Colorado or use of the entire waste tire to generate energy or fuel in Colorado; and

May deny:

The rebate to a person that is out of compliance with any state or federal environmental laws, rules, or regulations; and

All future rebates pursuant to this section and grants of money from the waste tire administration, enforcement, market development, and cleanup fund created in section 30-20-1404 to an applicant that knowingly or intentionally provides false information to the department when applying for a rebate or for a grant of money from the waste tire administration, enforcement, market development, and cleanup fund.

Waste tires obtained from rural counties are eligible for an additional rebate amount of twenty-five dollars per ton; however, the additional rebate amount must not exceed the rebate amount for tier 3 rebates as determined by the commission by rule pursuant to subsection (5)(e)(III) of this section. To qualify for the additional rebate amount set forth in this subsection (7), an end user must provide evidence to the department documenting the county of origin for each waste tire.

The department shall require that an end user submit an application for a rebate that contains self-certifications provided by the end user regarding:

The total tonnage of tires processed; and

The total tonnage of tires collected in rural counties.

The department may issue rebates after January 1, 2026, only for end uses occurring and rebates applied for on or before December 31, 2025.

The commission shall repeal any rules concerning the fund and implementation of this section once the department has issued the final rebates pursuant to subsection (9)(a) of this section.

On July 1, 2026, the state treasurer shall transfer any money left in the fund to the general fund.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1582, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section RC&RE, (SB 19-198), ch. 402, p. 3560, § 4, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(1.5) added, (HB 20-1406), ch. 178, p. 814, § 19, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 2018. (See L. 2014, p. 1582.) However, this section was recreated August 2, 2019.

30-20-1406. Waste tire market development fund - creation - incentive programs - legislative declaration - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1584, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

IP(2)(f)(III) amended, (HB 17-1051), ch. 99, p. 353, § 72, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 2018. (See L. 2014, p. 1584.)

30-20-1407. Scope.

A person shall comply with every requirement of this part 14 that applies to the person's activities.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1585, § 1, effective July 1.

30-20-1408. Waste tire haulers.

A person who transports ten or more waste tires in any one load shall:

Transport the waste tires either out of state or to a registered waste tire generator, waste tire hauler, waste tire collection facility, waste tire processor, waste tire monofill, approved beneficial user of whole waste tires, municipal or county-owned waste tire collection area, or municipal or privately owned solid waste landfill in compliance with the rules promulgated pursuant to this article;

Register with the department as a waste tire hauler pursuant to rules promulgated pursuant to this section;

Affix to the vehicle used for such transportation a waste tire hauler decal acquired from the department pursuant to section 30-20-1417 (1);

Comply with the manifest requirements of section 30-20-1417 (2), including creating and maintaining, for at least three years, records relating to such transportation;

Submit an annual report to the department; and

Complete and submit self-certification documentation as required by the department.

A waste tire hauler that is not also registered as a waste tire collection facility, waste tire processor, or waste tire monofill shall not have on site:

More than one thousand five hundred waste tires at any one time;

A waste tire for more than three days; or

Waste tires outside the waste hauler's vehicle or trailer.

Law enforcement officers have authority to stop a person or persons hauling waste tires in violation of this section; impound the vehicle being used in violation of this section; and issue a citation to the driver.

A government entity that removes illegally disposed waste tires is exempt from this section if the waste tires are disposed of or recycled in accordance with this part 14.

Nothing in this section prohibits a beneficial user of waste tires from transporting waste tires to a department-approved beneficial use location.

The department may issue a waiver relating to any requirement of this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1585, § 1, effective July 1.

30-20-1409. Waste tire generators - requirements - exemptions.

A waste tire generator shall, as specified by the commission by rule:

Register with the department;

Affix a decal required pursuant to section 30-20-1417 (1) to the required location;

Maintain records, including the manifest required by section 30-20-1417 (2), relating to such generation;

Engage only a registered waste tire hauler to transport the waste tires the generator generates;

Develop and maintain written criteria for distinguishing waste tires from used tires, keep the criteria on site, and make the criteria available for inspection;

Clearly identify waste tires and used tires according to the criteria developed pursuant to paragraph (e) of this subsection (1); and

Organize used tires for sale in a manner that allows the inspection of each individual tire.

A waste tire generator is subject to the following requirements:

A generator that is not also registered as a waste tire collection facility, waste tire processor, or waste tire monofill shall not have on site more than one thousand five hundred waste tires at any one time;

A generator that sells replacement tires in Colorado shall not refuse to accept from a customer, at the point of transfer, waste tires of the same general type and in a quantity at least equal to the number of new tires purchased;

A generator may accept waste tires; and

A generator shall complete and submit to the department self-certification documentation as required by the department.

The department may issue a waiver relating to any requirement of this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1587, § 1, effective July 1.

30-20-1410. Used tire management.

A person who accumulates, stores, transports, or dispenses used tires shall:

Develop written criteria for distinguishing waste tires from used tires, maintain the criteria on site, and make the criteria available for inspection;

Clearly identify waste tires and used tires according to the criteria developed pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a);

Develop written criteria for distinguishing used tires being held for sale in Colorado from used tires being held for sale outside Colorado, maintain the criteria on site, and make the criteria available for inspection;

Clearly identify used tires being held for sale in Colorado and used tires being held for sale outside Colorado according to the criteria developed pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b); and

Organize used tires for sale in a manner that allows the inspection of each individual tire.

A person shall not sell a used tire if doing so would violate any of the conditions listed in section 42-4-228, C.R.S.

The department may issue a waiver relating to any requirement of this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1587, § 1, effective July 1.

30-20-1411. Waste tire collection facility - requirements - exemptions.

A person who owns or operates a waste tire collection facility shall, as specified by the commission by rule:

Establish and maintain financial assurance;

Register with the department;

Affix a decal required pursuant to section 30-20-1417 (1) to the required location;

Develop and maintain an engineering design and operations plan, including a fire prevention and control plan and a plan for emergency response;

Maintain records, including the manifests required by section 30-20-1417 (2), relating to the collection of waste tires;

Develop and maintain a closure plan;

Submit an annual report to the department; and

Complete and submit self-certification documentation as required by the department.

A waste tire collection facility that is not also registered as a waste tire processor or waste tire monofill shall not have on site more than seven thousand five hundred waste tires at any one time.

A local, state, or federal agency that stores waste tires as part of a roadside cleanup activity is exempt from this section if the agency stores fewer than one thousand five hundred waste tires at the facility and the waste tires are disposed of or recycled in accordance with this part 14.

The department may issue a waiver relating to any requirement of this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1588, § 1, effective July 1.

30-20-1412. Waste tire processors - requirements.

A waste tire processor shall, as specified by the commission by rule:

Establish and maintain financial assurance;

Register with the department;

Affix a decal required pursuant to section 30-20-1417 (1) to the required location;

Develop, maintain, keep available for inspection, and comply with an engineering design and operations plan, including a fire prevention and control plan, and a plan for emergency response;

Maintain records, including the manifests required by section 30-20-1417 (2), relating to the collection of waste tires;

Develop and maintain a closure plan;

Submit an annual report to the department; and

Complete and submit self-certification documentation as required by the department.

A waste tire processor is subject to the following:

A waste tire processor that is not also registered as a waste tire monofill shall not have at the processing facility at any one time more than the lesser of:

One hundred thousand waste tires;

The amount of waste tires allowed under local requirements; or

The amount of waste tires anticipated in the waste tire processor's financial assurance instrument.

Following a one-year accumulation period, the weight or volume of waste tires that are processed must be at least seventy-five percent of the total weight or volume of waste tires received and currently in storage over a three-year rolling average. The calculation and accumulation period specified in this paragraph (b) must be based on a measure approved by the commission by rule.

The department may issue a waiver relating to any requirement of this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1589, § 1, effective July 1.

30-20-1413. Mobile processors - requirements.

A mobile processor shall, as specified by the commission by rule:

Establish and maintain financial assurance in the amount of ten thousand dollars if not already registered as a waste tire collection facility, waste tire processor, or waste tire monofill;

Register the mobile processor's permanent business address with the department;

Affix a decal required pursuant to section 30-20-1417 (1) to the required location;

Develop and maintain an engineering design and operations plan, including a fire prevention and control plan;

Maintain mobile processing records, including the manifests required by section 30-20-1417 (2), relating to the mobile processing of waste tires;

Submit an annual report to the department;

Not lease or own the property on which the processing occurs;

Not accept or accumulate waste tires unless also registered as a waste tire processor at the property on which the processing occurs;

Notify and receive permission from the local governing authority to process waste tires at the location for any period of time;

Not process waste tires at a location for more than thirty consecutive days unless the mobile processor:

Receives department approval to process at the location; and

Remains in compliance with all state and local environmental requirements at the location of mobile processing; and

Complete and submit self-certification documentation as required by the department.

The department may issue a waiver relating to any requirement of this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1590, § 1, effective July 1.

30-20-1414. Limitations on the disposal of tires.

Except as specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), a person shall dispose of waste tires only by delivery to a generator engaging in waste tire collection, to a waste tire processor, to a waste tire monofill, or to a waste tire collection facility.

If a person is able to establish that due diligence has been conducted and no reasonable option for disposing of a waste tire as specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) is available, then the person may dispose of the waste tire in a solid wastes disposal site and facility or transfer station.

A waste tire generator and an owner or operator of a waste tire collection facility shall arrange for the commercial hauling of waste tires only with a hauler who is currently registered pursuant to section 30-20-1408.

Each waste tire improperly disposed of constitutes a separate violation.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1590, § 1, effective July 1.

30-20-1415. Waste tire monofills - requirements.

An owner or operator of a waste tire monofill shall, as specified by the commission by rule:

Establish and maintain financial assurance;

Register with the department;

Affix a decal required pursuant to section 30-20-1417 (1) in the required location;

Maintain a certificate of designation that contains an engineering design and operations plan, including a fire prevention and control plan, plan for emergency response, inventory reduction plan, and closure plan;

Maintain records, including the manifests required by section 30-20-1417 (2), relating to the storage of waste tires;

Submit an annual report to the department;

Comply with the monofill's certificate of designation;

Comply with the commission's rule on final disposal of waste tires;

Complete and submit self-certification documentation as required by the department;

On an annual basis, for every one waste tire received, end use at least two waste tires, or process at least two waste tires into tire-derived product; and

Not place any waste tires into monofill storage after January 1, 2018, and close, or cause to be closed, the waste tire monofill by July 1, 2024.

A governing body having jurisdiction shall not grant an application for a landfill designated for the disposal only of tires. Nothing in this section limits modifications to existing landfills that accept waste tires.

After soliciting public comment, the department may issue a waiver relating to any requirement of this section; except that the department shall not issue a waiver of subsection (1)(j) or (1)(k) of this section to a waste tire monofill owner or operator unless the owner or operator has demonstrated that it has achieved a net reduction on an annual basis in the number of waste tires in the monofill or unless an emergency event of limited duration such as a fire or flood, as defined by the commission, has occurred.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1591, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (SB 19-198), ch. 402, p. 3563, § 5, effective August 2.

30-20-1416. End users.

End users who use more than an amount set by the commission by rule of tire-derived product or whole waste tires used to generate energy or fuel shall, as specified by the commission by rule:

Register with the department;

Submit an annual report to the department;

Use only a registered hauler to haul waste tires; and

Maintain records, including the manifests required by section 30-20-1417 (2), relating to waste tires.

The department may issue a waiver relating to any requirement of this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1592, § 1, effective July 1.

30-20-1417. Decals - manifests.

Decals.

A person shall not store in Colorado ten or more waste tires for any purpose unless:

The department has issued a decal pursuant to this section; and

The person has, pursuant to rules promulgated pursuant to section 30-20-1401 (2), affixed the decal to a uniform location at the address used to store the waste tires or the vehicle used to haul waste tires or processing equipment.

The department shall issue a decal to a person if the person has submitted an application to the department containing all information required by rule promulgated pursuant to section 30-20-1401 (2) and is not in violation of any requirement of this part 14.

Decals are valid for a period determined by the commission by rule. A decal issued pursuant to this section must contain the information required by rule promulgated pursuant to section 30-20-1401 (2), including at least an expiration date and the decal number.

Uniform manifests.

A person shall not accept for transportation ten or more waste tires unless the person has completed a uniform manifest, available from the department's website, in a form established by the department containing the information specified by rule promulgated pursuant to section 30-20-1401 (2), including at least the following:

The manifest number;

The decal number of the vehicle used to transport the tires;

The person's name, address, telephone number, and signature, under penalty of perjury;

The current date; the waste tire registration number, name, address, and telephone number of the source of the tires; and the waste tire registration number, name, address, and telephone number of the facility to which the waste tires will be transported; and

The number or weight of tires in the load.

A waste tire hauler or mobile processor shall retain one copy of the manifest and, within a time period established by the commission by rule, shall provide one copy of the manifest to:

The source of the waste tire; and

The facility to which the waste tires are transported.

The waste tire hauler or mobile processor, the source of the waste tire, and the facility to which the waste tires are transported shall each keep a copy of the manifest for at least three years after the date stated on the manifest.

The department may enter and inspect the facility of any of the entities named on the manifest during normal business hours and may request a copy of the manifest. Failure to keep the manifest as required by this subparagraph (II) or to produce the manifest upon request by the department or the department's agent is a violation of this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1592, § 1, effective July 1.